Maine, session 132, LD219.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §1341, sub-§1, ¶A, as amended by PL 2021, c. 545, §1, is further
amended to read:
A. The Maine Center for Disease Control and Prevention may shall limit the number
of hypodermic apparatuses provided by the certified hypodermic apparatus exchange
programs to participants to one hypodermic apparatus per participant for each
hypodermic apparatus exchanged by that participant.